Utah statutes.
76-7-302.   Circumstances under which abortion authorized.

(1)  As used in this section, "viable" means that the unborn child has reached a stage of fetal development when the unborn child is potentially able to live outside the womb, as determined by the attending physician to a reasonable degree of medical certainty.

(2)  An abortion may be performed in this state only by a physician.

(3)  An abortion may be performed in this state only under the following circumstances:

(a)  the unborn child is not viable; or

(b)  the unborn child is viable, if:

(i)  the abortion is necessary to avert:

(A)  the death of the woman on whom the abortion is performed; or

(B)  a serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the woman on whom the abortion is performed;

(ii)   two physicians who practice maternal fetal medicine concur, in writing, in the patient’s medical record that the fetus has a defect that is uniformly diagnosable and uniformly lethal; or

(iii) (A)  the woman is pregnant as a result of:

(I)  rape, as described in Section 76-5-402;

(II)  rape of a child, as described in Section 76-5-402.1; or

(III)  incest, as described in Subsection 76-5-406(10) or Section 76-7-102; and

(B)  before the abortion is performed, the physician who performs the abortion:

(I)  verifies that the incident described in Subsection (3)(b)(iii)(A) has been reported to law enforcement; and

(II)  complies with the requirements of Section 62A-4a-403.

